Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-126
Health services; maximum payments; rules and regulations; standard of need for medical services; established.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations establishing maximum payments for all health services furnished to recipients of public assistance. Each county shall, not later than December 31, 1984, establish a standard of need for medical services furnished, pursuant to section 68-104, by the counties to indigent persons who are not eligible for other medical assistance programs. This standard shall not exceed the Office of Management and Budget income poverty guidelines.

Laws 1963, c. 384, § 1, p. 1229;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 25;

Laws 1982, LB 602, § 4;

Laws 1984, LB 886, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 286;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 236.